North Carolina, session 2025, HB761.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 11(1) of Article II of the Constitution of North Carolina reads
as rewritten:
"(1) Regular Sessions. The General Assembly shall meet in regular session in 1973 and
every two years thereafter on the day prescribed by law. Neither house shall proceed upon public
business unless a majority of all of its members are actually present. In odd-numbered years, the
General Assembly shall remain in regular session for no more than 90 legislative days. If the
General Assembly meets in regular session in even-numbered years, the General Assembly shall
remain in session for no more than 45 legislative days. Any reconvened session called under
Section 5 of Article III and any extra session called under Section 11(2) of Article II or Section
5(7) of Article III of the North Carolina Constitution shall be excluded from the calculations of
this section. No valid action, other than a resolution of adjournment, may be taken by the General
Assembly in regular session after the time limits prescribed in this subsection have expired."
SECTION 2. The amendment set out in Section 1 of this act shall be submitted to
the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on November 3, 2026,
which election shall be conducted under the laws then governing elections in the State. Ballots,
voting systems, or both may be used in accordance with the laws governing elections at that time.
The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to limit the number of days the General Assembly can be
in regular session in odd-numbered years to 90 legislative days and in even-numbered years to
45 legislative days."
SECTION 3. The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the referendum
conducted under Section 2 of this act. If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, then the Secretary of State shall enroll the
amendment so certified among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of votes cast
on the question are against the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment shall
have no effect.
SECTION 4. If the certification from the State Board of Elections under Section 3
of this act reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment set
out in Section 1 of this act, then that amendment is effective upon certification and applies to
regular sessions of the General Assembly beginning on or after that date.
*H761-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 761-First Edition